Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 24. Virginia Health Club Act.
§ 59.1-308.
Change in ownership of health club.

For purposes of this chapter, a health club shall be considered a new health club and subject to the requirements of a bond or letter of credit at the time the health club changes ownership. Any health club that has more than 50 percent ownership by the
same person or persons shall be considered as owned by the same owner. A change in ownership shall not release, cancel, or terminate liability under any bond or letter of credit previously filed unless the Commissioner agrees in writing
to such release, cancellation, or termination because the new owner has filed a new bond or letter of credit for the benefit of the previous owner’s members or because the former owner has refunded all unearned payments to its members.
Every change in ownership shall be reported in writing to the Commissioner at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the change in ownership.

History.
1984, c. 738; 1985, c. 585; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the section, “that” for “which,” “person or persons” for “stockholder(s) and/or partner(s),” and “50” for “fifty” in the second sentence; and substituted “10” for “ten” in the last sentence.

§ 59.1-308.1.
Production of records.

Every health club, upon the written request of the Commissioner, shall make available to the Commissioner its prepayment bank account records and all membership contracts for inspection and copying, to enable the Commissioner reasonably to determine compliance
with this chapter. Every health club shall maintain a true copy of each health club contract executed between the health club and a buyer. Each contract shall be maintained for its term, including any renewal. Every health club shall
maintain the executed health club contracts at a designated location where the contracts may be inspected by the Commissioner. If the location designated by the health club is outside Virginia, the health club shall pay the reasonable
travel costs of an inspection by the Commissioner.

History.
1985, c. 585; 1990, cc. 392, 433; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” throughout the section.

§ 59.1-308.2.
Investigations.

The Commissioner may:

Make necessary public or private investigations within or without this Commonwealth to determine any violations of the provisions of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to this chapter; and

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the Commissioner determines, as to all facts and circumstances concerning the matter under investigation.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the Commissioner may administer oaths or affirmations, and upon such motion or upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require
the production of any matter that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location
of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

Any proceeding or hearing of the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter, in which witnesses are subpoenaed and their attendance required for evidence to be taken, or any matter is to be produced to ascertain material evidence, shall take place within the
City of Richmond.

If any person fails to obey a subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the Commissioner and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the Commissioner may apply to the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond for an order compelling compliance.

The Board may adopt reasonable regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter and such regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

History.
1990, cc. 392, 433.

§ 59.1-309.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.)
of this title.

History.
1984, c. 738.

§ 59.1-310.
Applicability.

Sections 59.1-297, 59.1-298, 59.1-299, 59.1-304, and 59.1-305 shall not apply to health club contracts entered into before September 15, 2004.

History.
1984, c. 738; 2014, c. 459.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “club” for “spa” and “September 15, 2004” for “the effective date of this chapter.”